Ohio, session 136, SB410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.63 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.63. The fourteenth day of February is designated as "Woody Hayes Day" in recognition of Wayne Woodrow Hayes, the long-time Ohio state university football coach who was born on that day in Clifton, Ohio, in 1913.